Maine, session 132, LD1448.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §12709 is enacted to read:
§12709. Bog Lake public boat launch winter access
The department shall ensure that the gate to the Bog Lake public boat launch in the
Town of Northfield is open from January 1st to March 15th each year.